incubator/apertium-olo-fin/apertium-olo-fin.olo.lexc
LEXICON propernouns

Karjal:Karjal PROP_KARJAL  ;
Anus:Anuks PROP_ANUS  ;
Venʼa:Venʼa PROP_KALA  ;
elokuu:elo#kuu PROP_KUU  ;
heinykuu:heiny#kuu PROP_KUU  ;
kevätkuu:kevät#kuu PROP_KUU  ;
kezäkuu:kezä#kuu PROP_KUU  ;
kylmykuu:kylmy#kuu PROP_KUU  ;
ligakuu:liga#kuu PROP_KUU  ;
oraskuu:oras#kuu PROP_KUU  ;
pakkaskuu:pakkas#kuu PROP_KUU  ;
Petroskoi:Petroskoi PROP_ARTELI  ;
sulakuu:sula#kuu PROP_KUU  ;
syvyskuu:syvys#kuu PROP_KUU  ;
talvikuu:talvi#kuu PROP_KUU  ;
tuhukuu:tuhu#kuu PROP_KUU  ;


LEXICON A_
%<a%>: # ;

LEXICON A_JIÄTÖI
! jiätöi:jiät
 A_HUOLETOI ;
LEXICON A_HUOLETOI
! huoletoi:huolet
%<a%>:oi SGNOMSUF ;
%<a%>:toma SGPARSUF_A2 ; 
%<a%>:tomie PLGENSUF ; 
%<a%>:tomi PLPARSUF_i ; 
%<a%>%<der_mwn%>: N_HUOLETOI ; 
%<n%>:toma Adj-NB-i ; !2012-09-27 unknown -loi vs -i

LEXICON A_KARJALAINE
! karjalaine:karjala
%<a%>:ine SGNOMSUF ;
%<a%>:s SGPARSUF_dU1 ;
%<a%>:zie PLGENSUF ;
%<a%>:zi PLPARSUF_i ;
%<a%>:zi PLINSSUF ;
%<a%>:ze Adj-NB-i ;

LEXICON A_KIELINE
! kieline:kieli
%<a%>: NMN_KIELINE ;

LEXICON A_OZA !! oza:oza
%<a%>: NMN_OZA ;

LEXICON A_ARMAS
! armas:arma
%<a%>:%^WEAK%>s SGNOMSUF ;
%<a%>:%^WEAK%>s SGPARSUF_dU1 ;
%<a%>:hie PLGENSUF ;
%<a%>:hi PLPARSUF_i ;
%<a%>:hi PLINSSUF ;
%<a%>:ha Noun-NB-i ;


LEXICON A_PAREMBI
! parembi:paremb
%<a%>:i SGNOMSUF ;
%<a%>:A1 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
%<a%>:ie PLGENSUF ;
%<a%>:i PLPARSUF_i ;
%<a%>%<der_mwn%>: N_PAREMBI ;
%<n%>:A1 Adj-NB-i ; !2012-09-27 unknown -loi vs -i


LEXICON Adj-NB-i
! These cases are symmetrically marked for number
%<sg%>: Adj-NB-01 ;
%<pl%>:%>i Adj-NB-01 ;
! The next two share the same stem vowel
%<sg%>: SGGENSUF ; ! The singular comitative is declined here
%<pl%>: PLNOMSUF ;

LEXICON Adj-NB-loi
! These cases are symmetrically marked for number
%<sg%>: Adj-NB-01 ;
%<pl%>:%>loi Adj-NB-01 ;
! The next two share the same stem vowel
%<sg%>: SGGENSUF ; ! The singular comitative is declined here
%<pl%>: PLNOMSUF ;

LEXICON Adj-NB-01
%<ess%>:%^WEAK%>nnU1 K ;
%<tra%>:%^WEAK%>kse K ;
%<ine%>:%^WEAK%>s K ;

%<ela%>:%^WEAK%>s K ;
%<ill%>:%>h K ;
%<ade%>:%^WEAK%>l K ;
%<abl%>:%^WEAK%>l K ;
%<all%>:%^WEAK%>le K ;
%<abe%>:%^WEAK%>ttA1h K ;
%<use_sub%>%<abe%>:%^WEAK%>ttA1 K ;
%<use_sub%>%<abe%>:%^WEAK%>tA1 K ;
%<prl%>:%>či K ;
%<apr%>:%^WEAK%>llU1O1 K ;
%<ter%>:%^WEAK%>ssA1h K ;


!! Noun inflection
!! ---------------
!! Livvi nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON N_
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<tyä%>: # ;



LEXICON N_HUOLETOI !!= @CODE@ huoletoi: huolet
%<n%>:oi SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:toma SGPARSUF_A2 ;
%<n%>:tomie PLGENSUF ;
%<n%>:tomi PLPARSUF_i ;
%<n%>:tomi PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>:toma Noun-NB-i ;

LEXICON N_KANDAI !!= @CODE@ kandai:kandai
%<n%>: SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:A1 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
%<n%>:ie PLGENSUF ;
%<n%>:i PLPARSUF_i ;
%<n%>:i PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>%<sg%>:A1 Noun-NB-01 ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:i Noun-NB-01 ;

LEXICON N_PAGIZII !!= @CODE@ pagizii:pagizii
%<n%>: SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:A2 SGGENSUF ;
%<n%>:A2 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
%<n%>:%>O1i PLGENSUF ;
%<n%>:%>O1i PLPARSUF_i ;
%<n%>:%>O1i PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>:A2 Noun-NB-01 ;
%<n%>:%>O1 Noun-NB-01 ;

LEXICON N_ANUS !!= @CODE@ aigomus:aigomuks
%<n%>: NMN_ANUS ;

LEXICON N_ANUS-PL !!= @CODE@ aigomus:aigomuks
%<n%>: NMN_ANUS-PL ;

LEXICON N_KARJAL !!= @CODE@ karjal:karjal
%<n%>: SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:a SGPARSUF_dU1 ;
%<n%>:a%>i PLGENSUF ;
%<n%>:i PLPARSUF_i ;
%<n%>:oi PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>:A1 Noun-NB-i ;

LEXICON N_ARTELI
%<n%>: NMN_ARTELI ;

LEXICON N_KARJALAINE !!= @CODE@ karjalaine:karjala
%<n%>:    NMN_KARJALAINE	 ;

LEXICON N_KIELI !!= @CODE@ kieli:kiel
%<n%>:i SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:e SGGENSUF ;
%<n%>: SGPARSUF_dU1 ;
%<n%>%<sg%>:e Noun-NB-01 ;
%<n%>:e PLNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:ie PLGENSUF ;
%<n%>:i PLPARSUF_i ;
%<n%>:i PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:i Noun-NB-01 ;

LEXICON N_KUU !!= @CODE@ kuu:kuu
%<n%>: NMN_KUU ;

LEXICON N_MUARJU !!= @CODE@ muarju:muarja
%<n%>:%^A2U SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>: SGGENSUF ;
%<n%>: SGPARSUF_A2 ;
%<n%>%<sg%>: Noun-NB-01 ;
%<n%>: PLNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:%>oi PLGENSUF ; ! the plural comitative is declined here
%<n%>:%>oi PLPARSUF_a ;
%<n%>:%>oi PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>oi Noun-NB-01 ;

LEXICON N_KALA !!= @CODE@ kala:kala
%<n%>: NMN_KALA ;

LEXICON N_OZA !!= @CODE@ oza:oza
%<n%>: NMN_OZA ;

LEXICON N_ARMAS !!= @CODE@ armas:arma
%<n%>:%^WEAK%>s SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:%^WEAK%>s SGPARSUF_dU1 ;
%<n%>:hie PLGENSUF ;
%<n%>:hi PLPARSUF_i ;
%<n%>:hi PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>:ha Noun-NB-i ;

LEXICON N_PAREMBI !!= @CODE@ parembi:paremb
%<n%>:i SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:A1 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
%<n%>:ie PLGENSUF ;
%<n%>:i PLPARSUF_i ;
%<n%>:i PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>:A1 Noun-NB-i ;

LEXICON N_KOIRU !!= @CODE@ koiru:koira
 N_PÄIVY ;

LEXICON N_NIMI !!= @CODE@ 
%<n%>:i SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:e SGPARSUF_A2 ;
%<n%>:%>ie PLGENSUF ; ! the plural comitative is declined here
%<n%>:%>i PLPARSUF_i ;
%<n%>:%>i PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>:e Noun-NB-i ;
%<n%>:iloi PLGENSUF ;
%<n%>:iloi PLPARSUF_Zero ;
%<n%>:iloi PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>:i Noun-NB-loi ;

LEXICON N_LAPSI !!= @CODE@ lapsi:laps
%<n%>:i SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:e SGGENSUF ;
%<n%>:%^KS2S SGPARSUF_dU1 ;
%<n%>:e PLNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:%>ie PLGENSUF ; ! the plural comitative is declined here
%<n%>:%>i PLPARSUF_i ;
%<n%>:%>i PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>%<sg%>:e Noun-NB-01 ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:i Noun-NB-01 ;

LEXICON N_VUOZI !!= @CODE@ vuozi:vuot
%<n%>:%^T2Z%>i SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:e SGGENSUF ;
%<n%>: SGPARSUF_dU1 ;
%<n%>:%^T2Z%>ie PLGENSUF ; ! the plural comitative is declined here
%<n%>:%^T2Z%>i PLPARSUF_i ;
%<n%>:%^T2Z%>i PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>:e Noun-NB-01 ;
%<n%>:%^T2Z%>i Noun-NB-01 ;

LEXICON N_PÄIVY !!= @CODE@ päivy:päivä
%<n%>:%^A2U SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>: SGGENSUF ;
%<n%>: SGPARSUF_A2 ;
%<n%>: PLNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:%>ie PLGENSUF ; ! the plural comitative is declined here
%<n%>:%>i PLPARSUF_i ;
%<n%>:%>i PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>%<sg%>: Noun-NB-01 ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>i Noun-NB-01 ;

LEXICON N_KOIVU !!= @CODE@ koivu:koivu
%<n%>: SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>: SGGENSUF ;
%<n%>: SGPARSUF_A2 ;
%<n%>: PLNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:%>lO1i PLGENSUF ; ! the plural comitative is declined here
%<n%>:%>lO1i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
%<n%>:%>lO1i PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>%<sg%>: Noun-NB-01 ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>lO1i Noun-NB-01 ;

LEXICON N_KIELINE !!= @CODE@ kieline:kieli
%<n%>: NMN_KIELINE ;

LEXICON N_RUNO !!= @CODE@ runo:runo
%<n%>: SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>: SGPARSUF_A2 ;
%<n%>:loi PLGENSUF ;
%<n%>:loi PLPARSUF_Zero ;
%<n%>:loi PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>: Noun-NB-loi ;

!! NMN
LEXICON NMN_ANUS !!= @CODE@ Anus:Anuks
	NMN_ANUS-SG ;
	NMN_ANUS-PL ;

LEXICON NMN_ANUS-SG
%<n%>:%^KS2S SGNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:e SGGENSUF ;
%<n%>:%^KS2S SGPARSUF_dU1 ;
%<n%>%<sg%>:e Noun-NB-01 ;

LEXICON NMN_ANUS-PL
%<n%>:e PLNOMSUF ;
%<n%>:%>ie PLGENSUF ; ! the plural comitative is declined here
%<n%>:%>i PLPARSUF_i ;
%<n%>:%>i PLINSSUF ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:i Noun-NB-01 ;

LEXICON NMN_KUU
 SGNOMSUF ;
 SGPARSUF_dU1 ;
:%>lO1i PLGENSUF ;
:%>lO1i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
:%>lO1i PLINSSUF ;
%<sg%>: Noun-NB-01 ;
: Noun-NB-loi ;

LEXICON NMN_KALA !!= @CODE@ 
 SGNOMSUF ;
 SGGENSUF ;
 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
 PLNOMSUF ;
:i PLGENSUF ;
:i PLPARSUF_a ;
:i PLINSSUF ;
: Noun-NB-i ;

LEXICON NMN_KARJAL !!= @CODE@ karjal:karjal
 SGNOMSUF ;
:A2 SGGENSUF ;
:A2 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
:%>O1i PLGENSUF ;
:%>O1i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
:%>O1i PLINSSUF ;
%<sg%>:A2 Noun-NB-01 ;
%<pl%>:%>O1i Noun-NB-01 ;


LEXICON NMN_ARTELI !!= @CODE@ arteli:arteli
 SGNOMSUF ;
 SGGENSUF ;
 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
:i PLGENSUF ;
:%>lO1i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
:%>lO1i PLINSSUF ;
%<sg%>: Noun-NB-01 ;
%<pl%>:%>lO1i Noun-NB-01 ;

LEXICON NMN_OZA !!= @CODE@ oza:oza
 SGNOMSUF ;
 SGGENSUF ;
 SGPARSUF_A2 ;
:i PLGENSUF ;
:i PLPARSUF_a ;
:i PLINSSUF ;
%<sg%>: Noun-NB-01 ;
%<pl%>:i Noun-NB-01 ;

LEXICON NMN_KIELINE
:ne SGNOMSUF ;
:ze SGGENSUF ;
:s SGPARSUF_dU1 ;
:zie PLGENSUF ;
:zi PLPARSUF_i ;
:zi PLINSSUF ;
%<sg%>:ze Noun-NB-01 ;
%<pl%>:zi Noun-NB-01 ;

LEXICON NMN_KARJALAINE
:ine SGNOMSUF ;
:ze SGGENSUF ;
:s SGPARSUF_dU1 ;
:ze PLNOMSUF ;
:zie PLGENSUF ;
:zi PLPARSUF_i ;
:zi PLINSSUF ;
%<sg%>:ze Noun-NB-01 ;
%<pl%>:zi Noun-NB-01 ;


LEXICON Noun-NB-i
! These cases are symmetrically marked for number
%<sg%>: Noun-NB-01 ;
%<pl%>:%>i Noun-NB-01 ;
! The next two share the same stem vowel
 SGGENSUF ; ! The singular comitative is declined here
 PLNOMSUF ;
 

LEXICON adjectives
aijembi:aijembi A_PAREMBI  ;
alembi:alembi A_PAREMBI  ;
arbumatoi:arbumat A_HUOLETOI  ;
hajukas:hajukka A_ARMAS  ;
harjuamatoi:harjuamat A_HUOLETOI  ;
heinävynnyh:heinävynnyh A_  ;
heittämätöi:heittämätöi A_JIÄTÖI  ;
jogapäiväine:jogapäiväine A_  ;
junokas:junokka A_ARMAS  ;
kanzalliskieline:kanzalliskieli A_KIELINE  ;
karjalaine:karjalaine A_KARJALAINE  ;
kengätöi:kengätöi A_JIÄTÖI  ;
kirjatoi:kirjat A_HUOLETOI  ;
kirvehelluaittu:kirvehelluaittu A_  ;
lahjakas:lahjakka A_ARMAS  ;
lekkui:lekkui A_  ;
libeikieline:libeikieli A_KIELINE  ;
loppumatoi:loppumat A_HUOLETOI  ;
läbipiäzemätöi:läbipiäzemätöi A_JIÄTÖI  ;
nerokas:nerokka A_ARMAS  ;
niittämätöi:niittämätöi A_JIÄTÖI  ;
nuorembi:nuoremb A_PAREMBI  ;
näivištymätöi:näivištymätöi A_JIÄTÖI  ;
oma:oma A_OZA  ;
ozatoi:ozat A_HUOLETOI  ;
paltinahiine:paltinahiine A_  ;
parrakas:parrakka A_ARMAS  ;
pehmeikieline:pehmeikieli A_KIELINE  ;
pilvetöi:pilvetöi A_JIÄTÖI  ;
rivukas:rivukka A_ARMAS  ;
satattamatoi:satattamat A_HUOLETOI  ;
suomenkieline:suomenkieli A_KIELINE  ;
syötetty:syötetty A_  ;
tiedämätöi:tiedämätöi A_JIÄTÖI  ;
uallokas:uallokka A_ARMAS  ;
vaikastumatoi:vaikastumat A_HUOLETOI  ;
vepsänkieline:vepsänkieli A_KIELINE  ;
vieraskieline:vieraskieli A_KIELINE  ;
virduaju:virduaju A_  ;
yksikäzine:yksi#käzine A_KIELINE  ;
čoma:čoma A_OZA  ;
LEXICON nouns
abu:abu N_KOIVU  ;
akku:akka N_MUARJU  ;
alakuu:ala#kuu N_KUU  ;
andilas:andila N_ARMAS  ;
aprelikuu:apreli#kuu N_KUU  ;
arteli:arteli N_ARTELI  ;
avgustukuu:avgustu#kuu N_KUU  ;
avosuu:avo#suu N_KUU  ;
bibu:bibu N_  ;
dužin:dužin N_  ;
emäččukoiru:emäčču#koira N_KOIRU  ;
gost'u:gost' N_MUARJU  ;
gurbu:gurb N_MUARJU  ;
hagomado:hagomado N_RUNO  ;
haikostus:haikostuks N_ANUS  ;
halvaštandu:halvaštandu N_MUARJU  ;
hebožien% vaihtai:hebožien% vaihtai N_KANDAI  ;
hiiri:hiir N_KIELI  ;
hämähäkki:hämähäkki N_  ;
ihastus:ihastuks N_ANUS  ;
ižäččukoiru:ižäčču#koira N_KOIRU  ;
ižändy:ižänd N_PÄIVY  ;
ižännimi:ižännim N_NIMI  ;
jiätora:jiätora N_ARMAS  ;
johtai:johtai N_KANDAI  ;
joudoaigu:joudo#aiga N_MUARJU  ;
juoksii:juoksii N_PAGIZII  ;
kabalo:kabalo N_RUNO  ;
kadovuozi:kado#vuot N_VUOZI  ;
kagaraine:kagara N_KARJALAINE  ;
kala:kala N_KALA  ;
kannas:kanna N_ARMAS  ;
kargavusvuozi:kargavus#vuot N_VUOZI  ;
kargu:kargu N_  ;
karjal:karjal N_KARJAL  ;
nuorižoliittolaine:nuorižoliittola N_KARJALAINE  ;
venʼalaine:venʼala N_KARJALAINE  ;
karvaine:karva N_KARJALAINE  ;
kehitys:kehityks N_ANUS  ;
keizotuskohtu:keizotus#kohtu N_KOIRU  ;
kielastelii:kielastelii N_PAGIZII  ;
kieli:kiel N_KIELI  ;
kivikala:kivi#kala N_KALA  ;
kiänös:kiänöks N_ANUS  ;
kodilaine:kodila A_KARJALAINE  ;
kohendai:kohendai N_KANDAI  ;
koiru:koira N_KOIRU  ;
kolmaspäivy:kolmas#päivä N_PÄIVY  ;
koro:koro N_RUNO  ;
kruavatti:kruavatti N_  ;
kuu:kuu N_KUU  ;
kylä:kylä N_OZA  ;
kyrzy:kyrz N_PÄIVY  ;
lapsi:laps N_LAPSI  ;
mua:maa N_KUU  ;
muzei:muzei N_KOIVU  ;
nelläspäivy:nelläs#päivä N_PÄIVY  ;
nimi:nim N_NIMI  ;
niäritysnimi:niäritys#nim N_NIMI  ;
nora:nora N_OZA  ;
nuori:nuor N_KIELI  ;
nänniniekkulapsi:nänniniekku#laps N_LAPSI  ;
ogahakas:ogahakka N_ARMAS  ;
olii:olii N_PAGIZII  ;
opastai:opastai N_KANDAI  ;
ottolapsi:otto#laps N_LAPSI  ;
oza:oza N_OZA  ;
pada:pada N_KALA  ;
pago:pago N_RUNO  ;
panos:panoks N_ANUS  ;
piendu:piendu N_  ;
pikkaraine% lapsi:pikkaraine% laps N_LAPSI  ;
pizaraine:pizara N_KARJALAINE  ;
poikkipiäzendykohtu:poikki#piäzendy#kohta N_KOIRU  ;
poštinkandai:poštinkandai N_KANDAI  ;
pyhäpäivy:pyhä#päivä N_PÄIVY  ;
rahvas:rahva N_ARMAS  ;
roskusieni:rosku#sien N_KIELI  ;
sanalo:sanalo N_RUNO  ;
siibi:siibi N_  ;
siriččiproidii:siriččiproidii N_PAGIZII  ;
suksittai:suksittai N_KANDAI  ;
suoni:suon N_KIELI  ;
taivas:taiva N_ARMAS  ;
teatru:teatra N_MUARJU  ;
torguiččii:torguiččii N_PAGIZII  ;
ulgopuoli:ulgo#puol N_KIELI  ;
vahnin:vahnin N_  ;
vastumaine:vastuma N_KARJALAINE  ;
vellekset:velleks N_ANUS-PL  ;
voitto:voitto N_RUNO  ;
vuolažu% kohtu:vuolažu% kohta N_KOIRU  ;
vuozi:vuot N_VUOZI  ;
vuozipäivy:vuozi#päivä N_PÄIVY  ;
yhtevys:yhtevyks N_ANUS  ;
yllyttelii:yllyttelii N_PAGIZII  ;
čuassoloikohendai:čuassoloikohendai N_KANDAI  ;
škola:škola N_OZA  ;
